pl: Pozycja sweet spot: Przedłużona; Cała powierzchnia odbicia; Wysoka; Niska; Średnio-niska; Środkowa; Średnio-wysoka; Asymetryczna (przesunięta); Inna
hu: Ideális találati pont pozíciója: Kiterjesztett; Teljes ütőfelület; Magas; Alacsony; Alacsony-közepes; Közepes; Közepes-magas; Eltolt; Egyéb
zh-CN: 最佳击球点: 延伸型; 全板型; 高; 低; 中低; 中; 中高; 偏移型; 其他
tr: Tatlı nokta konumu: Uzatılmış; Tam pala; Yüksek; Düşük; Düşük-orta; Orta; Orta-yüksek; Ofset; Diğer
fr: Position de la zone de frappe optimale: Étendu; Lame complète; Haut; Bas; Moyen-bas; Moyen; Moyen-haut; Décalé; Autre
sk-SK: Poloha optimálneho miesta zásahu: Rozšírený; Celá čepeľ; Vysoký; Nízky; Nižší stred; Stredný; Vyšší stred; Posunutý; Iná
nl: Sweet spot positie: Verlengd; Hele blad; Hoog; Laag; Laag-midden; Midden; Midden-hoog; Versprongen; Overig
sv: Träffpunktens läge: Förlängd; Hela bladet; Hög; Låg; Låg-mellan; Mellan; Mellan-hög; Förskjuten; Annan
sl-SI: Položaj idealne točke udarca: Razširjen; Celotno rezilo; Visoko; Nizko; Srednje nizko; Srednje; Srednje visoko; Zamaknjeno; Drugo
zh-TW: 擊球甜蜜點位置: 延伸; 完整拍面; 高; 低; 中低; 中; 中高; 偏移; 其他
ro-RO: Zona optimă de lovire: Extins; Paletă completă; Sus; Jos; Mediu-jos; Mediu; Mediu-înalt; Decalat; Altele
bg-BG: Оптимална позиция: Удължена; Цяло острие; Висока; Ниска; Ниско-средна; Средна; Средно-висока; Изместена; Друго
el: Ιδανική θέση: Εκτεταμένο; Σε όλη τη λεπίδα; Υψηλό; Χαμηλό; Χαμηλό-μεσαίο; Μεσαίο; Μεσαίο-υψηλό; Παράκεντρο; Άλλο
fi: Optimaalinen osuma-alue: Laajennettu; Koko lapa; Korkea; Matala; Keskialhaalta; Keski; Keskikorkealta; Siirretty; Muu
ru: Расположение «зоны оптимального удара»: Расширенная; Вся поверхность; Высокая; Низкая; Ниже средней; Средняя; Выше средней; Смещенная; Другое
cs: Poloha optimálního úderového bodu: Rozšířené; Celá čepel; Vysoká; Nízká; Nižší střední; Střední; Vyšší střední; Odsazené; Jiné
th: ตำแหน่งจุดที่เหมาะสมที่สุด: ส่วนขยาย; เต็มใบมีด; สูง; ต่ำ; กลางค่อนต่ำ; กลาง; กลางค่อนสูง; ออฟเซ็ต; อื่นๆ
nb: Sweet spot-posisjon: Utvidet; Hele bladet; Høy; Lav; Lav-midt; Midten; Midt-høy; Forskjøvet; Annet
es: Posición del punto óptimo: Extendido; Hoja completa; Alto; Bajo; Medio-bajo; Medio; Medio-alto; Desplazado; Otro
ko: 스위트 스폿 위치: 확장; 풀 블레이드; 하이; 로우; 로우 미드; 미드; 미드 하이; 오프셋; 기타
hr-HR: Pozicija idealne točke: Produženo; Cijela oštrica; Visoko; Nisko; Srednje nisko; Sredina; Srednje visoko; Pomaknuto; Ostalo
ja: スイートスポット位置: エクステンデッド; フルブレード; ハイ; ロー; ローミッド; ミッド; ミッドハイ; オフセット; その他
it: Posizione dello sweet spot: Esteso; Lama intera; Alta; Bassa; Medio-bassa; Media; Medio-alta; Sfalsata; Altro
en: Sweet spot position: Extended; Full blade; High; Low; Low-mid; Mid; Mid-high; Offset; Other
pt-BR: Sweet spot posição: Estendido; Lâmina completa; Alto; Baixo; Médio-baixo; Médio; Médio-alto; Deslocado; Outro
vi: Vị trí điểm tối ưu: Mở rộng; Toàn bộ mặt; Cao; Thấp; Trung bình thấp; Trung bình; Trung bình cao; Lệch; Khác
da: Sweet spot-position: Udvidet; Fuldt blad; Høj; Lav; Lav-mellem; Mellem; Mellem-høj; Forskudt; Andet
lt-LT: Smūgio taško padėtis: Praplėsta; Visa mentė; Aukšta; Žema; Žema – vidutinė; Vidutinė; Vidutinė – aukšta; Poslinkis; Kita
de: Position des Sweet Spots: Erweitert; Gesamtes Blatt; Hoch; Tief; Tief-mittig; Mitte; Mittig-hoch; Versetzt; Sonstige
pt-PT: Posição do ponto ideal de batida: Prolongado; Lâmina completa; Alto; Baixo; Médio-baixo; Médio; Médio-alto; Deslocado; Outro